Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-2014
Public Counsel; public officer or employee; acted to warrant criminal proceedings; refer to proper authorities.

If the Public Counsel has reason to believe that any public officer or employee has acted in a manner warranting criminal or disciplinary proceedings, the Public Counsel shall refer the matter to the appropriate authorities.

Laws 1969, c. 762, § 13, p. 2883;

Laws 2020, LB1144, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-8,252;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 14.